Massachusetts, session 194th, H4372.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27A of chapter 261 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “indigent” and inserting in
place thereof the following definition:-
''Indigent'', (a) a person who receives one of the following types of public assistance:
transitional aid to families with dependent children, emergency aid to elderly, disabled and
children, supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits, refugee cash assistance, need-
based veterans' benefits or SSI state supplemental program benefits; (b) a person whose income,
after taxes, is 125 per cent or less of the current poverty guidelines established annually by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Section 673(2) of the Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act of 1981 (42 U.S.C. 9902(2)), as amended; or (c) a person who is unable to
pay the fees and costs of the proceeding in which they are involved or is unable to do so without
depriving themselves or their dependents of the necessities of life, including food, shelter and
clothing, but an inmate shall not be adjudged indigent pursuant to section 27C unless the inmate
of 3

has complied with the procedures set forth in section 29 and the court finds that the prisoner is
incapable of making payments under the plans set forth in said section 29.
SECTION 2. Section 2A of chapter 211D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out the second paragraph of subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
Any time the court receives information causing its determination of a person’s indigency
status to be in doubt, the court shall order the chief probation officer or the officer's designee to
reassess the financial circumstances of the person to ensure that the person meets the definition
of indigency. The chief probation officer or the officer's designee shall prepare, sign and file a
written report certifying that the person meets, or does not meet, the definition of indigency.
SECTION 3. Said section 2A of said chapter 211D, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 87-89, the words “, other than the bi-annual reassessments
required by the defendant’s representation for the first offense,”
SECTION 4. Said section 2A of said chapter 211D, as so appearing, is further amended
by striking out subsections (f), (g) and (h).
SECTION 5. Said section 2A of said chapter 211D, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(i) The office of the commissioner of probations hall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the
number of individuals claiming indigency who are determined to be indigent; (b) the number of
individuals claiming indigency who are determined not to be indigent; (c ) the number of
of 3

individuals found to have misrepresented wage, tax or asset information; (d) the number of
individuals found to no longer qualify for appointment of counsel upon any re-assessment of
indigency required by this section; and (e) other pertinent information to ascertain the
effectiveness of indigency verification procedures. The information within such reports shall be
delineated by court division and delineated further by month.
of 3